Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 2 INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
25.5-10-204. Duties of the executive director - state board rules - definition - repeal.

In order to implement the provisions of this article 10, the executive director shall, subject to available appropriations, carry out the following duties:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Conduct monitoring and review activities that include community-centered boards, service agencies, and case management agencies;

(a)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Conduct monitoring and review activities that include case management agencies and service agencies;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Provide or obtain training and technical assistance through community-centered boards, service agencies, and case management agencies in order to improve the quality of services and supports provided to persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Provide or obtain training and technical assistance through case management agencies and service agencies in order to improve the quality of long-term services and supports provided to persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

[Editor's note: This version of introductory portion to subsection (1)(c) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Prepare and transmit annually to the governor and the joint budget committee of the general assembly, in the form and manner prescribed pursuant to section 24-1-136, C.R.S., a report detailing the following information, as available and appropriate, that is broken down into designated service areas as well as provided in an overall statewide format:

(c)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1)(c) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Prepare and transmit annually to the governor and the joint budget committee of the general assembly, in the form and manner prescribed pursuant to section 24-1-136, a report detailing the following information, as available and appropriate, that is broken down into defined service areas as well as provided in an overall statewide format:

The total number of persons receiving services pursuant to this article;

The types of services and supports provided;

The costs of services and supports regardless of funding source;

An evaluation of the quality of the services and supports rendered;

An evaluation of the effectiveness of the services and supports rendered in implementing the individualized plans of persons receiving services;

The numbers, types, and resolution of appeals that were heard by the state department arising from disputes specified in section 25.5-10-212; and

The number of persons determined to be eligible to receive services and supports who are not receiving services or supports pursuant to this article along with an analysis of the reasons they are not receiving services and supports;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(d) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Designate a community-centered board in each designated service area in the state;

(d)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(d) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Designate a case management agency in each defined service area in the state;

Implement the provision of home- and community-based services to eligible persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and pursue other medicaid-funded services determined by the state department to be appropriate for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, pursuant to part 4 of article 6 of this title and subject to available appropriations;

Promote effective coordination with agencies serving persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities in order to improve continuity of services and supports for persons facing life transitions from toddler to preschool, school to adult life, and work to retirement; and

Facilitate employment first policies and practices by:

Developing practices that reflect a presumption that all persons with disabilities are capable of working in competitive integrated employment if they choose to do so, and ensuring that options for competitive integrated employment with appropriate supports are explored before consideration of segregated activities;

Providing state department input and assistance to the employment first advisory partnership described in section 8-84-303, C.R.S., in carrying out its duties;

Establishing annual reporting of the following data, reported by county, for individuals eligible for supported employment services, including but not limited to home- and community-based waiver services:

The number of individuals employed in group employment, the sector of employment, the mean wage per hour earned, and the mean hours worked per week;

The number of individuals employed in competitive integrated employment, the sector of employment, the mean wage per hour earned, and the mean hours worked per week;

The number of individuals employed and served in prevocational services, the sector of employment, the mean wage per hour earned, the mean hours worked per week, and the mean service hours per week;

The number of individuals served in community-based nonwork and the mean service hours per week;

The number of individuals served in specialized habilitation services and the mean service hours per week;

The number of individuals employed or served, as applicable, in any other employment services or day services model, the sector of employment, and the mean wage per hour worked, mean hours worked per week, or the service hours per week, as applicable;

The number of individuals eligible for employment services, regardless of whether the individual is utilizing employment services; and

The number of individuals served earning less than minimum wage.

Maintaining Colorado's membership in the state employment leadership network that was founded as a joint partnership between the national association of state directors of developmental disabilities services and the institute for community inclusion at the university of Massachusetts Boston or another similar organization that facilitates collaboration with other states to share effective solutions to increase employment outcomes for persons with disabilities; and

Presenting the reports and recommendations of the employment first advisory partnership to the state department's legislative committee of reference pursuant to section 8-84-303 (7), C.R.S.

The state board shall adopt such rules, in accordance with section 24-4-103, as are necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of this article 10, including but not limited to the following subjects:

Standards for services and supports, including preparation of individualized plans;

The designation of community-centered boards and the organization of those entities, including standards of organization, staff qualifications, and other factors necessary to ensure program integrity;

This subsection (2)(b) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Purchase of services and supports and financial administration;

Procedures for resolving disputes over eligibility determination and the modification, denial, or termination of services;

Eligibility determination, the criteria for determination, and admission to the program;

Systems of quality assurance and data collection;

The rights of a person receiving services;

Confidentiality of records of a person receiving services;

Designation of authorized representatives and delineation of their rights and duties pursuant to this article;

The establishment of guidelines and procedures for authorization of persons for administration of nutrition and fluids through gastrostomy tubes.

The state department shall require that a service agency providing residential or day program services or supports have a staff member qualified pursuant to subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (j) on duty at any time the facility administers said nutrition and fluids through gastrostomy tubes, and that the facility maintain a written record of each nutrient or fluid administered to each person receiving services, including the time and the amount of the nutrient or fluid.

A person who is not otherwise authorized by law to administer nutrition and fluids through gastrostomy tubes is allowed to perform the duties only under the supervision of a licensed nurse or physician. A person who administers nutrition and fluids in compliance with the provisions of this subsection (2)(j) is exempt from the licensing requirements of the "Colorado Medical Practice Act", article 240 of title 12, and the "Nurse and Nurse Aide Practice Act", article 255 of title 12. Nothing in this subsection (2)(j) shall be deemed to authorize the administration of medications through gastrostomy tubes. A person administering medications through gastrostomy tubes is subject to the requirements of part 3 of article 1.5 of title 25.

For purposes of this paragraph (j), "administration" means assisting a person in the ingestion of nutrition or fluids according to the direction and supervision of a licensed nurse or physician.

No later than July 1, 2019, the state board, in conjunction with the department of labor and employment, shall require a nationally recognized supported employment training certificate or nationally recognized supported employment certification for all vendors of supported employment services, including supported employment professionals who provide individual competitive integrated employment outcomes, and excluding those professionals exclusively providing group or other congregate services. The state board's rules must include time frames for compliance with the training or certification requirement for existing staff and for newly hired staff and requirements for supervision of newly hired staff until the staff member has completed the training or certification. The time frames established in the state board's rules must provide for training to be completed over a five-year period, subject to the availability of appropriations for reimbursement of vendors pursuant to subsection (2)(k)(II) of this section.

The training or certification requirement in subsection (2)(k)(I) of this section is contingent upon appropriations to the department of health care policy and financing for reimbursement to vendors of supported employment services for the cost of training and certification. The state board shall adopt rules for administering the reimbursement to vendors, which reimbursement must be three hundred dollars for each certification exam and twelve hundred dollars for each training program certificate, which includes reimbursement for both the cost of the training and wages paid to employees during training. The state board may increase the fixed reimbursement amount over time based on increases in the cost of the exam and employee wages.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1752, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2016:

(1)(e) and (1)(f) amended and (1)(g) added, (SB 16-077), ch. 360, p. 1505, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(b) amended, (HB 17-1343), ch. 320, p. 1722, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

(1)(g)(III) and IP(2) amended and (2)(k) added, (SB 18-145), ch. 215, p. 1370, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(2)(j)(III) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1711, § 192, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(2)(j)(III) amended, (HB 20-1183), ch. 157, p. 704, § 63, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(a), (1)(b), IP(1)(c), and (1)(d) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 339, § 39, effective July 1, 2024; (2)(b)(II) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 339, 354, §§ 39, 70.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-103 as it existed prior to 2013.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 16-077, see section 1 of chapter 360, Session Laws of Colorado 2016. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-145, see section 1 of chapter 215, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-10-205. Community-centered boards and service agencies - local public procurement units.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until July 1, 2024.

]

For purposes of entering into a cooperative purchasing agreement pursuant to section 24-110-201, C.R.S., a nonprofit community-centered board or a nonprofit service agency may be certified as a local public procurement unit as provided in section 24-110-207.5, C.R.S.

25.5-10-205. Case management agencies - local public procurement units.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective July 1, 2024.

]

For purposes of entering into a cooperative purchasing agreement pursuant to section 24-110-201, a nonprofit case management agency or a nonprofit service agency may be certified as a local public procurement unit as provided in section 24-110-207.5.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1754, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 339, § 40, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-103.5 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-206. Authorized long-term services and supports - conditions of funding - purchase of services and supports - adult protective services data system check - boards of county commissioners - appropriation.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Subject to annual appropriations by the general assembly, the state department shall provide or purchase, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, authorized services and supports from community-centered boards, case management agencies, or service agencies for persons who have been determined to be eligible for such services and supports pursuant to section 25.5-10-211 and as specified in the eligible person's individualized plan. Those services and supports may include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Subject to annual appropriations by the general assembly, the state department shall provide or purchase, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, authorized long-term services and supports from case management agencies or service agencies for persons who have been determined to be eligible for such long-term services and supports pursuant to section 25.5-6-1704 and as specified in the eligible person's individualized plan. Those long-term services and supports may include, but need not be limited to, the following:

Family support services, including an array of supportive services provided to the person receiving services and the person's family, that enable the family to maintain the person in the family home, thereby preventing or delaying the need for out-of-home placement that is unwanted by the person or the family, pursuant to section 25.5-10-301;

Case management services;

Respite care services, including temporary care of a person with an intellectual and developmental disability to offer relief to the person's family or caregiver or to allow the family or caregiver to deal with emergency situations or to engage in personal, social, or routine activities and tasks that otherwise may be neglected, postponed, or curtailed due to the demands of supporting a person who has an intellectual and developmental disability;

Day services and supports that offer opportunities for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities to experience and actively participate in valued adult roles in the community. These services and supports will enable persons receiving services to access and participate in community activities, such as work, recreation, higher education, and senior citizen activities. Day services may also include the administration of nutrition or fluids through gastrostomy tubes, if administered by a person authorized pursuant to section 25.5-10-204 (2)(j) and supervised by a licensed nurse or physician.

Residential services and supports, including an array of training, learning, experiential, and support activities provided in living alternatives designed to meet the individual needs and preferences of persons receiving services and may include the administration of nutrition or fluids through gastrostomy tubes, if administered by a person authorized pursuant to section 25.5-10-204 (2)(j) and supervised by a licensed nurse or physician; and

Ancillary services, including activities that are secondary but integral to the provision of the services and supports specified in this subsection (1).

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Service agencies, community-centered boards, and case management agencies receiving funds pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall comply with all of the provisions of this article 10 and the rules promulgated thereunder.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Service agencies and case management agencies receiving funds pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall comply with all of the provisions of this article 10 and the rules promulgated thereunder.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Case management services must be purchased from the community-centered board designated pursuant to section 25.5-10-209 or the case management agency, except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(3)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Case management services must be purchased from the case management agency, except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (4)(a) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The state department may purchase services and supports directly from service agencies and case management services from case management agencies if:

(4)

(a) [Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (4)(a) is effective July 1, 2024.] The state department may purchase long-term services and supports directly from service agencies and case management services from case management agencies if:

Required by the federal requirements for the state to qualify for federal funds under Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, including programs authorized pursuant to part 4 of article 6 of this title; or

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(a)(II) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The executive director has determined that a service or support provided or purchased by a designated community-centered board does not meet established standards and the continuation of purchase of the service or support through the community-centered board is not in the best interests of the persons receiving services.

(II)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(a)(II) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The executive director has determined that a long-term service or support provided or purchased by a case management agency does not meet established standards and the continuation of purchase of the long-term service or support through the case management agency is not in the best interests of the persons receiving services.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(b)(I) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The state department shall only purchase services and supports directly from those community-centered boards, case management agencies, or service agencies that meet established standards.

The standards referenced in subsection (4)(b)(I) of this section must include a requirement that, on and after January 1, 2019, prior to employment, the name of a person who will be providing direct care, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (3.5), to an at-risk adult, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (1.5), as well as any other required identifying information, is submitted to the department of human services for a check of the Colorado adult protective services data system pursuant to section 26-3.1-111, to determine if the person is substantiated in a case of mistreatment of an at-risk adult.

(b) (I)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(b)(I) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The state department shall only purchase long-term services and supports directly from those case management agencies or service agencies that meet established standards.

The state department may purchase services and supports, including service and support coordination, from a family caregiver if the executive director has determined that the provision of a service or support by a family caregiver in the family home would provide the person receiving the service or support with the least restrictive environment.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the provision of services and supports, including case management services, directly by the department of human services through regional centers, for persons receiving services in regional centers.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the provision of services and supports, including case management services, directly by the state department.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (5) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Governmental units, including but not limited to counties, municipalities, school districts, health service districts, and state institutions of higher education, are authorized at their own expense to furnish money, materials, or services and supports to persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, or to purchase services and supports for such persons through designated community-centered boards, case management agencies, or service agencies, so long as no conditions or requirements imposed as a result of the provision or purchase conflict with the provisions of this article 10 or the rules promulgated thereunder.

(5)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (5) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Governmental units, including but not limited to counties, municipalities, school districts, health service districts, and state institutions of higher education, are authorized at their own expense to furnish money, materials, or long-term services and supports to persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, or to purchase long-term services and supports for such persons through designated case management agencies or service agencies, so long as no conditions or requirements imposed as a result of the provision or purchase conflict with the provisions of this article 10 or the rules promulgated thereunder.

Boards of county commissioners may levy up to one mill for the purpose of purchasing services and supports for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities. To the extent authorized by federal law, and subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and pursuant to rules established by the state board, a county may transfer the revenue raised pursuant to the mill levy to the state department to receive matching federal funds to provide medicaid-approved waiver services to persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Each year the general assembly shall appropriate moneys to the state department to provide or purchase services and supports for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities pursuant to this section. Unless specifically provided otherwise, services and supports shall be purchased on the basis of state funding less any federal or cash funds received for general operating expenses from any other state or federal source, less funds available to a person receiving residential services or supports after such person receives an allowance for personal needs or for meeting other obligations imposed by federal or state law, and less the required local school district funds specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (7). The yearly appropriation, when combined with all other sources of funds, shall in no case exceed one hundred percent of the approved program costs as determined by the general assembly.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (7)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Each school district shall pay to the community-centered board providing programs attended by a student with an intellectual and developmental disability, who is domiciled in the school district and may be counted in the district's pupil enrollment, an amount at least equal to the district's per pupil revenues as determined pursuant to the "Public School Finance Act of 1994", article 54 of title 22, C.R.S. This subsection (7) applies to students who are less than twenty-two years of age.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (7)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Each school district shall pay to the case management agency purchasing programs attended by a student with an intellectual and developmental disability, who is domiciled in the school district and may be counted in the district's pupil enrollment, an amount at least equal to the district's per pupil revenues as determined pursuant to the "Public School Finance Act of 1994", article 54 of title 22. This subsection (7) applies to students who are less than twenty-two years of age.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1754, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 17-1284), ch. 272, p. 1505, § 12, effective May 31; IP(1), (2), (3), IP(4)(a), (4)(b), and (5) amended, (HB 17-1343), ch. 320, p. 1723, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

IP(1), (2), (3), IP(4)(a), (4)(a)(II), (4)(b)(I), (5), and (7)(b) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 339, § 41, effective July 1, 2024.

25.5-10-207. Long-term services and supports - waiting list reduction - cash fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1757, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2014:

(1.5), (2), and (3) amended and (3.5) added, (HB 14-1252), ch. 18, p. 135, § 1, effective March 1; (2) repealed, (HB 14-1051), ch. 33, p. 184, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2015:

(6) added, (SB 15-168), ch. 16, p. 40, § 1, effective March 13.

L. 2016:

(7) added, (SB 16-196), ch. 226, p. 866, § 4, effective June 6; (3)(b) and (3)(c) amended and (3)(d) added, (SB 16-192), ch. 256, p. 1052, § 2, effective June 8.

L. 2017:

IP(3), (3)(c), and (3)(d) amended and (3)(e), (8), and (9) added, (HB 17-1343), ch. 320, p. 1724, § 4, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

(3)(c) and (3)(e) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 340, § 42, effective July 1, 2024; (3)(d)(II) added by revision, (HB21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 340, 354, §§ 42, 70.

Editor's note:

Subsection (9)(a) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2022. (See L. 2017, p. 1724.)